Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-5267
Reissuance of health benefit plan; when; director; powers.

The director may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to require small employer carriers, as a condition of transacting business with small employers in this state after January 1, 1995, to reissue a health benefit plan to any small employer whose health benefit plan has been terminated or not renewed by the carrier after six months prior to January 1, 1995. The director may prescribe such terms for the reissuance of coverage as the director finds are reasonable and necessary to provide continuity of coverage to small employers.

Laws 1994, LB 1222, § 45.